Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1512
Voter registration; irregularities or defects; not a defense; when.

Irregularities or defects in the mode of noticing, convening, holding, or conducting any registration or revision of registration authorized by sections 32-301 to 32-330 shall not constitute a defense to a prosecution for a violation of any of the provisions of sections 32-1503 to 32-1511.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 411.